Wisconsin, session 2025, AB515.
do enact as follows:AB515,11Section 1. 12.09 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:AB515,2,2212.09 (title) Election threats and disturbances.AB515,23Section 2. 12.09 (4) of the statutes is created to read:AB515,2,7412.09 (4) No person may do any of the following with the intent to threaten 5the orderly conduct of an election, to interfere with voting or registration at a 6polling place during polling hours, or to interfere with in-person absentee voting at 7the office of the municipal clerk or at an alternate site under s. 6.855:AB515,2,88(a) Engage in loud, boisterous, or otherwise disruptive conduct.AB515,2,99(b) Engage in harassing or intimidating conduct.AB515,2,1110(c) Engage in conduct that would cause a reasonable person to suffer serious 11emotional distress or fear bodily injury.AB515,312Section 3. 12.60 (1) (bm) of the statutes is amended to read:AB515,2,141312.60 (1) (bm) Whoever violates s. 12.09 (4) or 12.13 (5) may be fined not more 14than $10,000 or imprisoned for not more than 9 months or both.AB515,415Section 4. 939.641 of the statutes is created to read:AB515,2,1816939.641 Penalties; crimes committed to disrupt an election. (1) If a 17person does all of the following, the classification of the underlying crime is 18increased as provided in sub. (2):AB515,3,11(a) Commits a crime under s. 940.32, 947.01, 947.013.AB515,3,52(b) Intentionally selects the person against whom the crime under par. (a) is 3committed in whole or in part because of the actor’s belief or perception that one of 4the following is true, regardless of whether the actor’s belief or perception was 5correct:AB515,3,761. The person was engaged in voting at a polling place, clerk’s office, or an 7absentee voting site.AB515,3,982. The person is an election official who was engaged in duties related to voter 9registration, voting, or canvassing.AB515,3,11103. The person is a municipal employee who was engaged in duties related to 11voter registration, voting, or canvassing.AB515,3,1412(2) (a) If the crime committed under sub. (1) is a violation of s. 940.32 that is 13ordinarily a Class I felony, the penalty increase under this section revises the 14classification of the crime to a Class H felony.AB515,3,1815(b) Except as provided in par. (c), if the crime committed under sub. (1) is a 16violation of s. 947.01 or 947.013 that is ordinarily a Class B misdemeanor, the 17penalty increase under this section revises the classification of the crime to a Class 18A misdemeanor.AB515,3,2319(c) If a person has one or more prior convictions to which par. (b) applies, if the 20crime committed under sub. (1) is a violation of s. 947.01 or 947.013 that is 21ordinarily a Class B misdemeanor, the penalty increase under this section changes 22the status of the crime to a felony and revises the classification of the crime to a 23Class I felony.AB515,4,224(3) This section provides for the enhancement of the penalties applicable for 1the underlying crime. The court shall direct that the trier of fact find a special 2verdict as to all of the issues specified in sub. (1).AB515,4,33